South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3403.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 6-29-720 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (D) The governing body of a municipality or county may not enact an ordinance to regulate the placement of political signs that are located on private property. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----